Utah statutes.
17B-2a-705.   Taxation -- Additional levy -- Election.

(1)  If a mosquito abatement district board of trustees determines that the funds required during the next ensuing fiscal year will exceed the maximum amount that the district is authorized to levy under Subsection 17B-1-103(2)(g), the board of trustees may call an election on a date specified in Section 20A-1-204 and submit to district voters the question of whether the district should be authorized to impose an additional tax to raise the necessary additional funds.

(2)  The board shall, for at least four weeks before the election:

(a)  publish notice of the election in a daily or weekly newspaper published in the district; or

(b)  if there is no daily or weekly newspaper published in the district, post notice of the election in three public places in the district.

(3)  No particular form of ballot is required, and no informalities in conducting the election may invalidate the election, if it is otherwise fairly conducted.

(4)  At the election each ballot shall contain the words, "Shall the district be authorized to impose an additional tax to raise the additional sum of $____?"

(5)  The board of trustees shall canvass the votes cast at the election, and, if a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the imposition of the tax, the district is authorized to impose an additional levy to raise the additional amount of money required.



Amended by Chapter 415, 2013 General Session

